Illinois, session 104th, SB1223.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fair Patient Billing Act is amended by 5changing Section 30 and by adding Sections 38 and 42 as 6follows: 7    (210 ILCS 88/30)8    Sec. 30. Pursuing collection action. 9    (a) Hospitals and their agents may pursue collection 10action against an uninsured patient only if the following 11conditions are met:12        (1) The hospital has complied with the screening 13    requirements set forth in Section 16 and applied and 14    exhausted any discount available to a patient under 15    Section 10 of the Hospital Uninsured Patient Discount Act. 16        (2) The hospital has given the uninsured patient the 17    opportunity to:18            (A) assess the accuracy of the bill;19            (B) apply for financial assistance under the 20        hospital's financial assistance policy; and21            (C) avail themselves of a reasonable payment plan.22        (3) If the uninsured patient has indicated an 23    inability to pay the full amount of the debt in one   SB1223- 2 -LRB104 03269 BAB 13291 b1    payment, the hospital has offered the patient a reasonable 2    payment plan. The hospital may require the uninsured 3    patient to provide reasonable verification of his or her 4    inability to pay the full amount of the debt in one 5    payment.6        (4) To the extent the hospital provides financial 7    assistance and the circumstances of the uninsured patient 8    suggest the potential for eligibility for charity care, 9    the uninsured patient has been given at least 90 days 10    following the date of discharge or receipt of outpatient 11    care to submit an application for financial assistance and 12    shall be provided assistance with the application in 13    compliance with subsection (a) of Section 16 and Section 14    27.15        (5) If the uninsured patient has agreed to a 16    reasonable payment plan with the hospital, and the patient 17    has failed to make payments in accordance with that 18    reasonable payment plan.19        (6) If the uninsured patient informs the hospital that 20    he or she has applied for health care coverage under a 21    public health insurance program (and there is a reasonable 22    basis to believe that the patient will qualify for such 23    program) but the patient's application is denied. 24    (a-5) A hospital shall proactively offer information on 25charity care options available to uninsured patients, 26regardless of their immigration status or residency.   SB1223- 3 -LRB104 03269 BAB 13291 b1    (b) A hospital may not refer a bill, or portion thereof, to 2a collection agency or attorney for collection action against 3the insured patient, without first ensuring compliance with 4Section 16 and offering the patient the opportunity to request 5a reasonable payment plan for the amount personally owed by 6the patient. Such an opportunity shall be made available for 7the 90 days following the date of the initial bill. If the 8insured patient requests a reasonable payment plan, but fails 9to agree to a plan within 90 days of the request, the hospital 10may proceed with collection action against the patient.11    (c) No collection agency, law firm, or individual may 12initiate legal action for non-payment of a hospital bill 13against a patient without the written approval of an 14authorized hospital employee who reasonably believes that the 15conditions for pursuing collection action under this Section 16have been met.17    (d) Nothing in this Section prohibits a hospital from 18engaging an outside third party agency, firm, or individual to 19manage the process of implementing the hospital's financial 20assistance and reasonable payment plan programs and policies 21so long as such agency, firm, or individual is contractually 22bound to comply with the terms of this Act. 23    (e) A medical creditor or medical debt collector that 24knows or should have known about an internal review, external 25review, or other appeal of a health insurance decision that is 26pending or was pending within the previous 180 days shall not:  SB1223- 4 -LRB104 03269 BAB 13291 b1        (1) communicate with the patient regarding the unpaid 2    charges for health care services for the purpose of 3    seeking to collect the charges; or4        (2) initiate a lawsuit or arbitration proceeding 5    against the consumer regarding the unpaid charges for 6    health care services.7    (f) A medical creditor that knows or should have known 8about an internal review, external review, or other appeal of 9a health insurance decision that is pending or was pending 10within the previous 180 days shall not refer, place, or send 11the unpaid charges for health care services to a medical debt 12collector, including by selling the debt to a medical debt 13buyer. 14(Source: P.A. 102-504, eff. 12-1-21; 103-323, eff. 1-1-24.) 15    (210 ILCS 88/38 new)16    Sec. 38. Medical debt interest.17    (a) If a patient is eligible for financial assistance and 18has entered into a reasonable payment plan with a hospital or 19health care provider, then no interest charges shall be added 20to the medical expenses.21    (b) If a patient is ineligible for financial assistance 22and has entered into a reasonable payment plan with a hospital 23or health care provider, interest charges shall not exceed 2% 24annually.25    (c) The rate of interest provided in subsection (a) or (b)   SB1223- 5 -LRB104 03269 BAB 13291 b1shall also apply to any judgments on medical debt, 2notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary.3    (d) This Section applies to payment plans entered into, 4amended, or renewed on or after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  6    (210 ILCS 88/42 new)7    Sec. 42. Debt forgiven by medical creditor. Forgiveness of 8any part of an insured patient's copayment, coinsurance, 9deductible, facility fee, out-of-network charge, or other cost 10sharing is not a breach of contract or other violation of an 11agreement between the medical creditor and the insurer or 12payor. This Section applies to contracts or agreements entered 13into, amended, or renewed on or after the effective date of 14this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.